Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201748-628.08
Benefits; disqualification; leave of absence.

An individual shall be disqualified for benefits for any week during which the individual is on a leave of absence.

Laws 2017, LB172, § 38.
January 1, 2018